California, session 20252026, SB561.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2920 of the Probate Code is amended to read:2920. (a) If any person domiciled in the county requires a guardian or conservator and there is no one else who is qualified and willing to act and whose appointment as guardian or conservator would be in the best interests of the person, then either of the following shall apply:(1) The public guardian shall apply for appointment as guardian or conservator of the person, the estate, or the person and estate, if there is an imminent threat to the person’s health or safety or the person’s estate.(2) The public guardian may apply for appointment as guardian or conservator of the person, the estate, or the person and estate in all other cases.(b) The public guardian shall apply for appointment as guardian or conservator of the person, the estate, or the person and estate, if the court so orders. The court may make an order under this subdivision on motion of an interested person or on the court’s own motion in a pending proceeding or in a proceeding commenced for that purpose. The court shall order the public guardian to apply for appointment as guardian or conservator of the person, the estate, or the person and estate, on behalf of any person domiciled in the county who appears to require a guardian or conservator, if it appears that there is no one else who is qualified and willing to act, and if that appointment as guardian or conservator appears to be in the best interests of the person. However, if prior to the filing of the petition for appointment it is discovered that there is someone else who is qualified and willing to act as guardian or conservator, the public guardian shall be relieved of the duty under the order. The court shall not make an order under this subdivision except after notice to the public guardian for the period and in the manner provided for in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 1460) of Part 1, consideration of the alternatives, and a determination by the court that the appointment is necessary. The notice and hearing under this subdivision may be combined with the notice and hearing required for appointment of a guardian or conservator.(c) (1) The public guardian shall acknowledge receipt of the referral and begin an investigation within two business days of receiving a referral for conservatorship or guardianship. The investigation shall conclude no more than 15 business days after receiving the referral, unless there is good cause for an extension. The public guardian shall notify the referring party of both of the following, as applicable: within a reasonable period of time.(1)The determination made at the conclusion of the investigation.(2)The extension of the investigation.(d)(1)If, during the investigation pursuant to subdivision (c), the public guardian determines a conservatorship pursuant to the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code) would be more appropriate for a proposed conservatee, the public guardian shall make a referral for investigation pursuant to the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act. The investigation opened pursuant to subdivision (c) shall remain open until the conclusion of the investigation pursuant to the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act.(2)If, during an investigation pursuant to the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act (Part 1 (commencing with Section 5000) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code), the public guardian determines a conservatorship pursuant to subdivision (c) would be more appropriate for a proposed conservatee, the public guardian shall make a referral for investigation pursuant to subdivision (c). The investigation opened pursuant to the Lanterman-Petris-Short Act shall remain open until the conclusion of the investigation pursuant to subdivision (c).(2) For referrals for conservatorship, the investigation shall include a determination of whether or not a temporary or general conservatorship is warranted. The public guardian shall inform the referring party of the status of the investigation upon request.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.